Utah statutes.
10-2-501.   Municipal disconnection -- Definitions -- Request for
disconnection -- Requirements upon filing request.
(1)  As used in this part "petitioners" means persons who:
(a)  own title to real property within the area proposed for disconnection;
and
(b)  have signed a request for disconnection proposing to disconnect that area
from the municipality.
(2) (a)  Petitioners proposing to disconnect an area within and lying on the
borders of a municipality shall file with that municipality’s legislative
body a request for disconnection.
(b)  Each request for disconnection shall:
(i)  contain the names, addresses, and signatures of the owners of more than
50% of the real property in the area proposed for disconnection;
(ii)  give the reasons for the proposed disconnection;
(iii)  include a map or plat of the territory proposed for disconnection; and
(iv)  designate between one and five persons with authority to act on the
petitioners’ behalf in the proceedings.
(3)  Upon filing the request for disconnection, petitioners shall:
(a)  cause notice of the request to be published:
(i)  once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation within the municipality; and
(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for three weeks;
(b)  cause notice of the request to be mailed to each owner of real property
located within the area proposed to be disconnected; and
(c)  deliver a copy of the request to the legislative body of the county in
which the area proposed for disconnection is located.
